test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-ngudiTS_gt-norm.yaml
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ӈудидась
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ӈудининзь
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ӈудидинзь
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ӈудидинзь
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ӈудинаць
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ӈудидаць
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ӈудидонзь
     ӈуда+N+Tra: ӈудаӈэ
     ӈуда+N+Car: ӈудасиˮ
     ӈуда+N+Equ: ӈудадаремʼ
     ӈуда+N+Equ+Lat: ӈудадаревʼ
